Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-980
Supplemental reimbursement.

An eligible provider as described in section 68-981 shall, in addition to the rate of payment that the provider would otherwise receive for medicaid ground emergency medical transport services, receive supplemental reimbursement pursuant to the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act.

Laws 2017, LB578, § 5.